New Jersey, session 221, A5105.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Beginning with the first full school year following the date of enactment of this act, the board of education of each school district shall incorporate instruction on bleeding control for students in grades nine through 12 as part of the districts implementation of the New Jersey Student Learning Standards in Comprehensive Health and Physical Education.  A board of education may utilize an instructional or training program established by the American College of Surgeons to meet the requirements of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.